Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.375

Agreement and order provisions—Participation in proceedings concerning regulation of pesticides or agricultural chemicals.

Any marketing agreement or order may authorize the members of a commodity board, or their agents or designees, to participate in federal or state hearings or other proceedings concerning regulation of the manufacture, distribution, sale, or use of any pesticide as defined by RCW 15.58.030 or any agricultural chemical which is of use or potential use in producing the affected commodity. Any marketing agreement or order may authorize the expenditure of commodity board funds for this purpose.

[ 2011 c 103 s 8; 2002 c 313 s 32; 1988 c 54 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.